src/errors/syncope.error.xfscript
define initialShortVowel [[a\[a]]|[i\[i]]|o\[o]] ; 

!cases of oversyncope usually take some consonants with them, so this, while well intentioned, is not really helpful
define oversyncopeDefinite [?* \[e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o] \[a|e|i|o] ?* ] ; !refine this to reflect syllable margins

![ [a|i|o] (->) 0 || [a|i|o] \[a|i|o] _ \[a|i|o] [a|i|o] ] ; !two sided open syllable (this environment should not be met with syncope definition ...
                                                                                !there are more environments to be found in the dictionary itself)
                                                                                !also, specifically look for cases within the scope of legal syllable margins
define undersyncopeDefinite [
                              ?* 
                              [e|a|i|o] !a syllable ...
                              [ !followed by a singleton
                                \[e|a|i|o]| !or
                                [ !a digraph
                                  [n s]| !nz can also signal a nasal vowel
                                  [n y]|
                                  [[z|s|c] h]
                                ] 
                              ]
                              [a|i|o] !followed by a short vowel
                              \[e|a|i|o]+ !followed by another syllable (aka not in the last syllable)
                              [e|a|i|o]
                              ?*
                            ] ; !need to omit final syllables from this
define undersyncopePossible [
                              ?* 
                              [e|a|i|o] !a syllable ...
                                [ !followed by
                                  [ !primary clusters + optional w
                                    [
                                      [[s (h)][p|t|k]]|
                                      [[m b]|[n [g|d|j|z (h)]]]
                                    ] 
                                    (w)
                                  ]| !or
                                  [ !consonants (less h, so +cons) + w
                                    [b|d|g|p|t|k|[s|z] (h)|c h|j|m|n]
                                  ]
                                  [w]
                                ] 
                              [a|i|o] !followed by a short vowel
                              \[e|a|i|o]+ !followed by another syllable (aka not in the last syllable)
                              [e|a|i|o]
                              ?*
                            ] ;  
                                                        
!need to flag word initial short vowels
!how about initial light syllables?? if it already is getting flagged as a non-form, sure, look at the initial syllable
!define undersyncope [
!                        [ [..] (->) i ||  \[a|i|o] _ \[a|i|o]  ] .o.
!                        [ [..] (->) a ||  \[a|i|o] _ \[a|i|o]  ] .o.
!                        [ [..] (->) o ||  \[a|i|o] _ \[a|i|o]  ] 
!                        ] !this is certainly over general
!                        ; 

!!this performs as expected in hfst-xfst (niniwgimag -> ninwagmag, ninwogmag, ninwigmag). in xfst there is a strange ninwgimag (with the real rhythmic syncope rules in the phonology, xfst also maps makizin to mkizn...)
!this will get really complicated in a full version that includes [a|i|o] -> %' and the various possibilities of syllable margins and digraphs
define syncopeFixNarrow [ 
                          [a|i|o] -> 0  //  [e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o] _      \[e|a|i|o]+                 [e|a|i|o] ,, !delete a vowel if the left output context has VC and right input context has another syllable

                          [..] -> a, [..] -> i, [..] -> o // \[e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o] _ \[e|a|i|o] !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
                        ] ;  

!regex to limit cases to adjacent singletons and no digraphs!!
!define narrowEligible [
!                        [e|a|i|o] 
!                        [
!                          \[e|a|i|o] !|
!                          ![
!                          !  [n s]|
!                          !  [n y]|
!                          !  [[z|s|c] h]
!                          !]
!                        ] 
!                      [a|i|o] 
!                      [
!                        [
!                          [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|w|y|h]
!                          [\[e|a|i|o|s|z|n|w|y]|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] ![b|d|g|p|t|k|j|h|m|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] !no w, y ... first element of digraphs but not if second element is there (cluster ambiguity can creep in here!!)
!                        ]|
!                        [
!                          [m]
!                          [\[e|a|i|o|s|z|n|b|w|y|]|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] ![d|g|p|t|k|j|h|m|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] !no b, w, y ... first element of digraphs but not if second element is there (cluster ambiguity can creep in here!!)
!                        ]|
!                        [
!                          [n]
!                          [\[e|a|i|o|s|z|n|g|d|j|w|y|h]|n\[y|h]] ![b|p|t|k|m|n\[y|h]] !no d, g, j, z, w, y ... first element of digraphs but not if second element is there (cluster ambiguity can creep in here!!)
!                        ]|
!                        [
!                          [s]
!                          [\[e|a|i|o|s|z|n|p|t|k|h|w|y|]|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] ![b|d|g|j|m|n\[y|h]] !no p, t, k, h, w, y. if we are assuming correct Fiero spelling, sh is not ambiguous with s'h ...
!                        ]|
!                        [
!                          [z]
!                          [\[e|a|i|o|s|z|n|h|w|y]|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]] ![p|t|k|b|d|g|j|m|[[s|z]\[h]]|n\[y|h]]
!                        ]
!                      ]
!                    ] ;

define postopenSyncopeApostrophe    [ 
                                      [a|i|o] -> %' //   [e|a|i|o] [s|z]                                         _ [h]             \[e|a|i|o]* [e|a|i|o], 
                                                         [e|a|i|o] n                                             _ [s|y|h|g|z (h)] \[e|a|i|o]* [e|a|i|o]  !mark a deleted vowel with an apostrophe in orthographically ambiguous contexts
                                    ] ; 
define syncopeFixBroad  [ postopenSyncopeApostrophe .o.

                          [a|i|o] (->) %' // [e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o]                            n       _ [s|y|h|g|z (h)] , 
                                             [e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o]                            [s|z]   _ h .o.

                          [a|i|o] (->) 0 //  [e|a|i|o] n                                     d       _ \[e|a|i|o]+ [e|a|i|o], 
                                             [e|a|i|o] m                                     b       _ \[e|a|i|o]+ [e|a|i|o], 
                                             [e|a|i|o] s (h)                                 [p|t|k] _ \[e|a|i|o]+ [e|a|i|o], 
                                             [e|a|i|o] [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|c h|[[s|z| (h)]]|m|n]  w       _ \[e|a|i|o]+ [e|a|i|o] .o.

                          [a|i|o] -> 0  //   [e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o] _      \[e|a|i|o]+                 [e|a|i|o] ,, !delete a vowel if the left output context has VC and right input context has another syllable


                          %' -> a, %' -> i, %' -> o       //    \[e|a|i|o] [s|z]         _ [h],
                                                                \[e|a|i|o] n             _ [s|y|h|g|z (h)] .o.
                          ![..] -> a, [..] -> i, [..] -> o // \[e|a|i|o|%'] \[e|a|i|o|%'] _ \[e|a|i|o|%'] !APOSTROPHE SENSITIVE VERSION (IS IT RIGHT?) insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C

                          [..] (->) a, [..] (->) i, [..] (->) o //  \[e|a|i|o] n _ [d|z (h)|g], 
                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] m _ b, !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] s (h) _ [p|t|k], !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|c h|[[s|z| (h)]]|m|n] _ w .o.

                          [..] -> a, [..] -> i, [..] -> o // \[e|a|i|o] \[e|a|i|o] _ \[e|a|i|o] !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
                        ] ;  
!regex                     [..] (->) a, [..] (->) i, [..] (->) o //  \[e|a|i|o] n _ [d|z (h)|g], 
!                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] m _ b, !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
!                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] s (h) _ [p|t|k], !insert a vowel if the left output context has CC and the right input context has C
!                                                                    \[e|a|i|o] [b|d|g|p|t|k|j|c h|[[s|z| (h)]]|m|n] _ w ; 
regex syncopeFixBroad ;
